Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-783
Petition; review; vote; when.

The city council of the city or board of trustees of the village shall review all petitions filed under section 31-781 and by formal vote of the council or board either grant or deny the petition. The vote shall be taken not later than the date of the first regular meeting of the council or board in July of the year in which the petition was filed.

Laws 1993, LB 210, § 3.